Nevada, session 83, SB42.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.205 1. The proposed budget for the Executive
Department of the State Government for each fiscal year must be set
up in four parts:
(a) Part 1 must consist of a budgetary message by the Governor
which includes:
(1) A general summary of the long-term performance goals
of the Executive Department of the State Government for:
-
*SB42*

– 3 –
(I) Core governmental functions, including the education
of pupils in kindergarten through grade 12, higher education, human
services and public safety and health; and
(II) Other governmental services;
(2) [An explanation of the means by which the proposed
budget will provide adequate funding for those governmental
functions and services such that ratable progress will be made
toward achieving those long-term performance goals;
(3)] An outline of any other important features of the
financial plan of the Executive Department of the State Government
for the next 2 fiscal years; and
[(4)] (3) A general summary of the proposed budget setting
forth the aggregate figures of the proposed budget in such a manner
as to show the balanced relations between the total proposed
expenditures and the total anticipated revenues, together with the
other means of financing the proposed budget for the next 2 fiscal
years, contrasted with the corresponding figures for the last
completed fiscal year and fiscal year in progress. The general
summary of the proposed budget must be supported by explanatory
schedules or statements, classifying the expenditures contained
therein by organizational units, objects and funds, and the income
by organizational units, sources and funds. The organizational units
may be subclassified by functions and by agencies, bureaus or
commissions, or in any other manner determined by the Chief.
(b) Part 2 must embrace the detailed budgetary estimates both of
expenditures and revenues as provided in NRS 353.150 to 353.246,
inclusive. The information must be presented in a manner which sets
forth separately the cost of continuing each program at the same
level of service as the current year and the cost, by budgetary issue,
of any recommendations to enhance or reduce that level of service.
Revenues must be summarized by type, and expenditures must be
summarized by program or budgetary account and by category of
expense. Part 2 must include:
(1) The identification of each long-term performance goal of
the Executive Department of the State Government for:
(I) Core governmental functions, including the education
of pupils in kindergarten through grade 12, higher education, human
services, and public safety and health; and
(II) Other governmental services,
 and of each intermediate objective for the next 2 fiscal years
toward achieving those goals.
(2) [An explanation of the means by which the proposed
budget will provide adequate funding for those governmental
functions and services such that those intermediate objectives will
-
*SB42*

– 4 –
be met and progress will be made toward achieving those long-term
performance goals.
(3) A mission statement and measurement indicators for each
department, institution and other agency of the Executive
Department of the State Government, which articulate the
intermediate objectives and long-term performance goals each such
department, institution and other agency is tasked with achieving
and the particular measurement indicators tracked for each such
department, institution and other agency to determine whether the
department, institution or other agency is successful in achieving its
intermediate objectives and long-term performance goals, provided
in sufficient detail to assist the Legislature in performing an analysis
of the relative costs and benefits of program budgets and in
determining priorities for expenditures. If available, information
regarding such measurement indicators must be provided for each of
the previous 4 fiscal years. If a new measurement indicator is being
added, a rationale for that addition must be provided. If a
measurement indicator is being modified, information must be
provided regarding both the modified indicator and the indicator as
it existed before modification. If a measurement indicator is being
deleted, a rationale for that deletion and information regarding the
deleted indicator must be provided.
(4)] Statements of the bonded indebtedness of the State
Government, showing the requirements for redemption of debt, the
debt authorized and unissued, and the condition of the sinking
funds.
[(5)] (3) Any statements relative to the financial plan which
the Governor may deem desirable, or which may be required by the
Legislature.
(c) Part 3 must set forth, for the Office of Economic
Development and the Office of Energy, the results of the analyses
conducted by those offices and reported to the Chief pursuant to
NRS 353.207 for the immediately preceding 2 fiscal years.
(d) Part 4 must include a recommendation to the Legislature for
the drafting of a general appropriation bill authorizing, by
departments, institutions and agencies, and by funds, all
expenditures of the Executive Department of the State Government
for the next 2 fiscal years, and may include recommendations to the
Legislature for the drafting of such other bills as may be required to
provide the income necessary to finance the proposed budget and to
give legal sanction to the financial plan if adopted by the
Legislature.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 353.211, as soon as
each part of the proposed budget is prepared, a copy of the part must
-
*SB42*

– 5 –
be transmitted to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for confidential examination and retention.
3. Except for the information provided to the Fiscal Analysis
Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau pursuant to NRS
353.211, parts 1 and 2 of the proposed budget are confidential until
the Governor transmits the proposed budget to the Legislature
pursuant to NRS 353.230, regardless of whether those parts are in
the possession of the Executive or Legislative Department of the
State Government. Part 4 of the proposed budget is confidential
until the bills which result from the proposed budget are introduced
in the Legislature. [As soon as practicable after the Governor
transmits the proposed budget to the Legislature pursuant to NRS
353.230, the information required to be included in the proposed
budget pursuant to subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must be posted on the Internet websites maintained by
the Budget Division of the Office of Finance.]
Sec. 2. NRS 353.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.207 1. The Chief shall:
(a) Require the Office of Economic Development and the Office
of Energy each periodically to conduct an analysis of the relative
costs and benefits of each incentive for economic development
previously approved by the respective office and in effect during the
immediately preceding 2 fiscal years, including, without limitation,
any abatement of taxes approved by the Office of Economic
Development pursuant to NRS 274.310, 274.320, 274.330, 360.750,
360.753, 360.754, 360.890, 360.950, 361.0687, 374.357 or
701A.210, to assist the Governor and the Legislature in determining
whether the economic benefits of the incentive have accomplished
the purposes of the statute pursuant to which the incentive was
approved and warrant additional incentives of that kind; and
(b) Require each office to report in writing to the Chief the
results of the analysis conducted by the office pursuant to paragraph
(a) . [; and
(c) Establish a schedule for performing and reporting the results
of the analysis required by paragraph (a) which ensures that the
results of the analysis reported by each office are included in the
proposed budget prepared pursuant to NRS 353.205, as required by
that section.]
2. Each report prepared for the Chief pursuant to this section is
a public record and is open to inspection pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 239.010.
Sec. 3. NRS 353.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.210 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6 and
7, on or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, all
departments, institutions and other agencies of the Executive
-
*SB42*

– 6 –
Department of the State Government, and all agencies of the
Executive Department of the State Government receiving state
money, fees or other money under the authority of the State,
including those operating on money designated for specific purposes
by the Nevada Constitution or otherwise, shall prepare, on blanks
furnished them by the Chief, and submit to the Chief:
(a) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency.
(b) The number of full-time equivalent positions within the
department, institution or agency that have been vacant for at least
12 months, the number of months each such position has been
vacant and the reasons for each such vacancy.
(c) Any existing contracts for services the department,
institution or agency has with temporary employment services or
other persons, the proposed expenditures for such contracts in the
next 2 fiscal years and the reasons for the use of such services. If
such contracts include any privatization contracts, a copy of each of
those privatization contracts together with:
(1) A statement specifying the duration of the privatization
contracts;
(2) The number of privatization contracts proposed for the
next 2 fiscal years and the estimated expenditures for the
privatization contracts; and
(3) An analysis of each of the privatization contracts, which
includes, without limitation:
(I) For the preceding, current and next fiscal years, the
annual amount required to perform each of the privatization
contracts; and
(II) For the preceding and current fiscal years, the number
of persons the department, institution or agency employed pursuant
to the privatization contracts, reflected as the equivalent full-time
position if the persons were regularly employed by the department,
institution or agency, including the equivalent hourly wage and the
cost of benefits for each job classification.
(d) If the department, institution or agency has any existing
performance contracts that it has entered into pursuant to chapter
333A of NRS, any request to reinvest any savings realized under
such a contract for the next 2 fiscal years.
(e) Estimates of expenditure requirements of the department,
institution or agency, together with all anticipated income from fees
and all other sources, for the next 2 fiscal years compared with the
corresponding figures of the last completed fiscal year and the
estimated figures for the current fiscal year.
2. The Chief shall direct that one copy of the forms submitted
pursuant to subsection 1, accompanied by every supporting schedule
-
*SB42*

– 7 –
and any other related material, be delivered directly to the Fiscal
Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau on or before
September 1 of each even-numbered year.
3. The Budget Division of the Office of Finance shall give
advance notice to the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau of any conference between the Budget Division of
the Office of Finance and personnel of other state agencies
regarding budget estimates. A Fiscal Analyst of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau or his or her designated representative may attend
any such conference.
4. The estimates of expenditure requirements submitted
pursuant to subsection 1 must be classified to set forth the data of
funds, organizational units, and the character and objects of
expenditures by program or budgetary account and by category
of expense . [, and must include a mission statement and
measurement indicators in adequate detail to comply with the
requirements of subparagraph (3) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 353.205.] The organizational units may be subclassified by
functions and by agencies, bureaus or commissions, or in any other
manner at the discretion of the Chief.
5. If any department, institution or other agency of the
Executive Department of the State Government, whether its money
is derived from state money or from other money collected under
the authority of the State, fails or neglects to submit estimates of its
expenditure requirements as provided in this section, the Chief may,
from any data at hand in the Chief’s office or which the Chief may
examine or obtain elsewhere, make and enter a proposed budget for
the department, institution or agency in accordance with the data.
6. Agencies, bureaus, commissions and officers of the
Legislative Department, the Public Employees’ Retirement System
and the Judicial Department of the State Government shall submit to
the Chief for his or her information in preparing the proposed
executive budget the budgets which they propose to submit to the
Legislature.
7. On or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, the
Tahoe Regional Planning Agency shall submit the budget which the
Agency proposes to submit to the Legislature to:
(a) The Chief for his or her information in preparing the
proposed executive budget.
(b) The Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
8. The information provided by a department, institution or
agency pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 is a public record
and must be open to public inspection.
-
*SB42*

– 8 –
9. As used in this section, “privatization contract” means a
contract executed by or on behalf of a department, institution or
agency which authorizes a private entity to provide public services
which are:
(a) Substantially similar to the services performed by the public
employees of the department, institution or agency; and
(b) In lieu of the services otherwise authorized or required to be
provided by the department, institution or agency.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB42*